California statutes. Penal Code
(b) (1) A victim of a sexual assault who seeks a medical evidentiary examination, as that term is used in Section 13823.93, shall be provided with a standardized medical evidentiary examination, using the medical evidentiary examination report forms and protocols for victims of sexual assault developed pursuant to Section 13823.5. A victim of a sexual assault shall not be required to participate or to agree to participate in the criminal justice system, either prior to the examination or at any other time. Pursuant to the requirements of the federal Violence Against Women and Department of Justice Reauthorization Act of 2005, and the federal Violence Against Women Reauthorization Act of 2013 through the federal Office of Violence Against Women, standardized medical evidentiary examinations consistent with
 Sections 13823.5 and 13823.7 shall be provided to sexual assault victims who are undecided at the time of an examination whether to report to law enforcement within the recommended timeframes for collection of evidence. Mandated reporting laws, pursuant to Section 11160, shall apply.

(2) Data from the medical evidentiary examination in paragraph (1), with the patient’s identity removed, may be collected for health and forensic purposes in accordance with state and federal privacy laws.

(c) The cost of a medical evidentiary examination performed by a qualified health care professional, hospital, or other emergency medical facility for a victim of a sexual assault shall be treated as a local cost and charged to and reimbursed within 60 days by the local law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the alleged offense was committed.

(1) All medical evidentiary examinations are to be reimbursed at the locally negotiated rate and shall not be subject to reduced reimbursement rates based on patient history or other reasons.

(2) (A) The local law enforcement agency may seek reimbursement, as provided in subdivision (d), to offset the cost of conducting the medical evidentiary examination of a sexual assault victim who is undecided at the time of an examination whether to report to law enforcement or who has decided not to report to law
 enforcement.

(B) The local law enforcement agency may seek reimbursement, as provided in subdivision (e), to offset the cost of conducting the medical evidentiary examination of a sexual assault victim who has determined, at the time of the examination, to report the assault to law enforcement. This subparagraph does not permit a law enforcement agency to reduce the existing locally negotiated rate or rates for medical evidentiary examinations.

(d) (1) The Office of Emergency Services shall use the discretionary funds from federal grants awarded to the agency pursuant to the federal Violence Against Women and Department of Justice Reauthorization Act of 2005 and the federal Violence Against Women Reauthorization Act of 2013 through the
 federal Office of Violence Against Women, specifically, the STOP (Services, Training, Officers, and Prosecutors) Violence Against Women Formula Grant Program, to offset the cost of the medical evidentiary examination.

(2) The Office of Emergency Services shall determine the amount that may be reimbursed to offset the cost of a medical evidentiary exam once every five years. Any increase to the amount that may be reimbursed to offset the cost of a medical evidentiary exam shall not exceed 50 percent of the reimbursement amount most recently determined by the Office of Emergency Services.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the Office of Emergency Services may redetermine the amount that may be reimbursed to offset the cost of a medical evidentiary exam, at any time, if the federal government reduces the amount of the grants described in paragraph (1).

(e) The Office of Emergency Services shall determine the amount that shall be reimbursed to offset the cost of medical evidentiary examinations pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). Reimbursements shall be provided from funds to be made available upon appropriation for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 25.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.11.

The minimum standards for the examination and treatment of victims of sexual assault or attempted sexual assault, including child sexual abuse, and the collection and preservation of evidence therefrom include all of the following:

(a) Law enforcement authorities shall be notified.

(b) In conducting the medical evidentiary examination, the outline indicated in the form adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13823.5 shall be followed.

(c) Consent for a physical examination, treatment, and collection of evidence shall be obtained.

(1) Consent to an examination for evidence of sexual assault shall be obtained prior to the examination of a victim of sexual assault and shall include separate written documentation of consent to each of the following:

(A) Examination for the presence of injuries sustained as a result of the assault.

(B) Examination for evidence of sexual assault and collection of physical evidence.

(C) Photographs of injuries.

(2) Consent to treatment shall be obtained in accordance with the usual policy of the hospital, clinic, sexual assault forensic examination team, or other emergency medical facility.

(3) A victim of sexual assault shall be informed that the victim may refuse to consent to an examination for evidence of sexual assault, including the collection of physical evidence, but that a refusal is not a ground for denial of treatment of injuries and for possible pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases, if the person wishes to obtain treatment and consents thereto.

(4) Pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6920) of Part 4 of Division 11 of the Family Code, a minor may consent to hospital, medical, and surgical care related to a sexual assault without the consent of a parent or guardian, and a minor may consent to, or withhold consent for, a medical evidentiary examination without the consent of a parent or guardian.

(5) In cases of known or
 suspected child abuse, the consent of the parents or legal guardian is not required. In the case of suspected child abuse and nonconsenting parents, the consent of the local agency providing child protective services or the local law enforcement agency shall be obtained. Local procedures regarding obtaining consent for the examination and treatment of, and the collection of evidence from, children from child protective authorities shall be followed.

(d) A history of sexual assault shall be taken. The history obtained in conjunction with the examination for evidence of sexual assault shall follow the outline of the form established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13823.5 and shall include all of the following:

(1) A history of the circumstances of the assault.

(2) For a child, any previous history of child sexual abuse and an explanation of injuries, if different from that given by parent or person accompanying the child.

(3) Physical injuries reported.

(4) Sexual acts reported, whether or not ejaculation is suspected, and whether or not a condom or lubricant was used.

(5) Record of relevant medical history.

(e) (1) If indicated by the history of contact, a female victim of sexual assault shall be provided with the option of postcoital contraception by a physician or other health care provider.

(2) Postcoital contraception shall be dispensed by a physician or other health care provider upon the request of the victim at no cost to the victim.

(f) (1) Each adult and minor victim of sexual assault who consents to a medical evidentiary examination shall have a physical examination that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Inspection of the clothing, body, and external genitalia for injuries and foreign materials.

(B) Examination of the mouth, vagina, cervix, penis, anus, and rectum, as indicated.

(C) Documentation of injuries and evidence collected.

(2) Children shall not have internal vaginal or anal examinations unless absolutely necessary. This paragraph does not preclude careful collection of evidence using a swab.

(g) The collection of physical evidence shall conform to the following procedures:

(1) Each victim of sexual assault who consents to an examination for collection of evidence shall have the following items of evidence collected, except if the victim specifically objects:

(A) Clothing worn during the assault.

(B) Foreign materials revealed by an examination of the clothing, body, external genitalia, and pubic hair combings.

(C) Swabs from the mouth, vagina, rectum, and penis, as indicated, to determine the presence or absence of semen.

(D) If indicated by the history of contact, the victim’s urine and blood sample, for toxicology purposes, to determine if drugs or alcohol were used in connection with the assault. Toxicology results obtained pursuant to this paragraph shall not be admissible in any criminal or civil action or proceeding against a victim who consents to the collection of physical evidence pursuant to this paragraph. Except for purposes of prosecuting or defending the crime or crimes necessitating the examination specified by this section, any toxicology results obtained pursuant to this paragraph shall be kept confidential, may not be further disclosed, and shall not be required to be disclosed by the victim for any purpose not specified
 in this paragraph. The victim shall specifically be informed of the immunity and confidentiality safeguards provided by this subparagraph.

(2) Each victim of sexual assault who consents to an examination for the collection of evidence shall have reference specimens taken, except if the victim specifically objects thereto. A reference specimen is a standard from which to obtain baseline information
 and may be retained for DNA comparison and analysis. Reference specimens may also be collected at a later time if they are needed. These specimens shall be taken in accordance with the standards of the local criminalistics laboratory.

(3) Sexually transmitted infection testing and presumptive treatment based on current guidelines of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention may be provided, if indicated by the history of contact. Specimens for a pregnancy test shall be taken, if indicated by the history of contact and the age of the victim. Baseline testing for sexually transmitted infections shall be done for a child, a person with a disability, or a person who is residing in a long-term care facility, if forensically indicated.

(4) (A) If indicated by the history of contact, a female victim of sexual assault shall be provided with the option of postcoital contraception by a physician or other health care provider.

(B) Postcoital contraception shall be dispensed by a physician or other health care provider upon the request of the victim at no cost to the victim.

(5) For a victim of sexual assault with an assault history of
 strangulation, best practices shall be followed for a complete physical examination and diagnostic testing to prevent adverse outcomes or morbidity and documentation on a supplemental medical evidentiary examination form.

(h) Preservation and disposition of physical evidence shall conform to the following procedures:

(1) All swabs shall be air-dried before packaging.

(2) All items of evidence including laboratory specimens shall be clearly labeled as to the identity of the source and the identity of the person collecting them.

(3) The evidence shall have a form attached which documents its chain of custody and shall be properly sealed.

(4) The evidence shall be turned over to the proper law enforcement agency.

(5) A hospital, clinic, or other emergency medical facility where medical evidentiary examinations are conducted shall develop and implement written policies and procedures for maintaining the confidentiality of medical evidentiary examination reports, including proper preservation and disposition of the reports if the examination program ceases operation, in order to prevent destruction of the medical evidentiary examination reports.

(i) On or before January 1, 2021, a hospital, clinic, or other emergency medical facility at which medical evidentiary examinations are conducted shall implement a system to maintain medical evidentiary
 examination reports in a manner that facilitates their release only as required or authorized by law. This subdivision does not require a hospital, clinic, or other emergency medical facility to review a patient’s medical records prior to January 1, 2021, in order to separate medical evidentiary examination reports from the rest of the patient’s medical records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 714, Sec. 8.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.12.

Failure to comply fully with Section 13823.11 or with the protocol or guidelines, or to utilize the form established by the Office of Emergency Services or the standardized sexual assault forensic medical evidence kit described in Section 13823.14, shall not constitute grounds to exclude evidence, nor shall the court instruct or comment to the trier of fact in any case that less weight may be given to the evidence based on the failure to comply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 857, Sec. 1.   (AB 1744)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.13.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop a course of training for qualified health care professionals relating to the examination and treatment of victims of sexual assault. In developing the curriculum for the course, the Office of Emergency Services shall consult with health care professionals and appropriate law enforcement agencies. The Office of Emergency Services shall also obtain recommendations from the same health care professionals and appropriate law enforcement agencies on the best means to disseminate the course of training on a statewide basis. The Office of Emergency Services is encouraged to designate a course of training for qualified health care professionals, as described in this section, and shall partner with
 other allied professionals training courses, such as sexual assault investigator
 training administered by the Peace Officer Standards and Training (POST), sexual assault prosecutor training as administered by the California District Attorneys Association (CDAA), or sexual assault advocate training as administered by the California Coalition Against Sexual Assault (CalCASA).

(b) The training course developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be designed to train qualified health care professionals to do all of the following:

(1) Perform a health assessment of victims of sexual assault in accordance with any applicable minimum standards set forth in Section 13823.11.

(2) Collect and document physical and laboratory evidence in accordance with any applicable minimum standards set forth
 in
 Section 13823.11.

(3) Provide information and referrals to victims of sexual assault to enhance the continuity of care of victims.

(4) Present testimony in court.

(c) As used in this section, “qualified health care professional” has the same meaning as defined in Section 13823.5.

(d) As used in this section, “appropriate law enforcement agencies” may include, but shall not be limited to, the Attorney General of the State of California, any district attorney, and any agency of the State of California expressly authorized by statute to investigate or prosecute law violators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 714, Sec. 9.   (AB 538)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.14.

(a) The Department of Justice’s Bureau of Forensic Services, the California Association of Crime Laboratory Directors, and the California Association of Criminalists shall provide leadership and work collaboratively with public crime laboratories to develop a standardized sexual assault forensic medical evidence kit for use by all California jurisdictions. The packaging and appearance of the kit may vary, but the kit shall contain a minimum number of basic components and also clearly permit swabs or representative evidence samples to be earmarked for a rapid turnaround DNA program, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 680, when applicable.

(b) The collaboration to establish the basic components for a standardized sexual assault forensic
 medical evidence kit should be completed by January 30, 2018, and shall be conducted in conjunction with the California Clinical Forensic Medical Training Center, authorized by Section 13823.93, that is responsible for the development of sexual assault forensic medical examination procedures and sexual assault standardized forensic medical report forms and for providing training programs.

(c) On or before May 30, 2019, the California Clinical Forensic Medical Training Center, in coordination with the Department of Justice’s Bureau of Forensic Services, the California Association of Crime Laboratory Directors, and the California Association of Criminalists, shall issue guidelines pertaining to the use of the standardized sexual assault kit components throughout the state.

(d) Every local and state agency shall remain responsible for its own costs in purchasing a standardized sexual
 assault forensic medical evidence kit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 588, Sec. 3.   (SB 22)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.15.

(a) The Legislature finds that the problem of domestic violence is of serious and increasing magnitude. The Legislature also finds that existing domestic violence services are underfunded and that some areas of the state are unserved or underserved. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that a goal or purpose of the Office of Emergency Services shall be to ensure that all victims of domestic violence served by the Office of Emergency Services Comprehensive Statewide Domestic Violence Program receive comprehensive,
 quality services.

(b) (1) There is in the Office of Emergency Services a Comprehensive Statewide Domestic Violence Program. The goals of the program shall be to provide local assistance to existing service providers, to maintain and expand services based on a demonstrated need, and to establish a targeted or directed program for the development and establishment of domestic violence services in currently unserved and underserved areas. The Office of Emergency Services shall provide financial and technical assistance to local domestic violence centers in implementing all of the following services:

(A) Twenty-four-hour crisis communication systems that shall include 24-hour telephone services and may also include other communication methods offered on a 24-hour or intermittent basis, such as text messaging, computer chat, or any other technology approved by the Office of Emergency Services.

(B) Counseling.

(C) Business centers.

(D) Emergency “safe” homes or shelters for victims and families.

(E) Emergency food and clothing.

(F) Emergency response to calls from law enforcement.

(G) Hospital emergency room protocol and assistance.

(H) Emergency transportation.

(I) Supportive peer counseling.

(J) Counseling for children.

(K) Court and social service advocacy.

(L) Legal assistance with temporary restraining orders, devices, and custody disputes.

(M) Community resource and referral.

(N) Household establishment
 assistance.

(2) Priority for financial and technical assistance shall be given to emergency shelter programs and “safe” homes for victims of domestic violence and their children.

(3) The portion of any grant funding awarded pursuant to this section that is funded by the state shall be distributed to the recipient in a single disbursement at the beginning of the grant period.

(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (f), the Office of Emergency Services and the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 13823.16 shall collaboratively administer the Comprehensive Statewide Domestic Violence Program, and shall allocate funds to local centers meeting the criteria for funding. All organizations funded pursuant to this section shall utilize volunteers to the greatest extent possible.

(2) The centers may seek, receive, and make use of any funds that may be available from all public and private sources to augment state funds received pursuant to this section.

(d) The Office of
 Emergency Services shall conduct statewide training workshops on domestic violence for local centers, law enforcement, and other service providers designed to enhance service programs. The workshops shall be planned in conjunction with practitioners and experts in the field of domestic violence prevention. The workshops shall include a curriculum component on lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender specific domestic abuse.

(e) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop and disseminate throughout the state information and materials concerning domestic violence. The Office of Emergency Services shall also establish a resource center for the collection, retention, and distribution of educational materials related to domestic violence. The Office of Emergency Services may utilize and contract with existing domestic violence technical assistance centers in this state in complying with the requirements of this subdivision.

(f) The funding process for distributing grant awards to domestic violence shelter service providers (DVSSPs) shall be administered by the Office of Emergency Services as follows:

(1) The Office of Emergency Services shall establish each of the following:

(A) The process and standards for determining whether to grant, renew, or deny funding to any DVSSP applying or reapplying for funding under the terms of the program.

(B) For DVSSPs applying for grants under the request for proposal process described in paragraph (2), a system for grading grant applications in relation to the standards established pursuant to subparagraph (A), and an appeal process for applications that are denied. A description of this grading system and appeal process shall be provided
 to all DVSSPs as part of the application required under the RFP process.

(C) For DVSSPs reapplying for funding under the request for application process described in paragraph (4), a system for grading the performance of DVSSPs in relation to the standards established pursuant to subparagraph (A), and an appeal process for decisions to deny or reduce funding. A description of this grading system and appeal process shall be provided to all DVSSPs receiving grants under this program.

(2) Grants for shelters that were not funded in the previous cycle shall be awarded as a result of a competitive request for proposal (RFP) process. The RFP process shall comply with all applicable state and federal statutes for domestic violence shelter funding and, to the extent possible, the response to the RFP shall not exceed 25 narrative pages, excluding attachments.

(3) Grants shall be awarded to DVSSPs that propose to maintain shelters or services previously granted funding pursuant to this section, to expand existing services or create new services, or to establish new domestic violence shelters in underserved or unserved areas. Each grant shall be awarded for a three-year term.

(4) DVSSPs reapplying for grants shall not be subject to a competitive grant process, but shall be subject to a request for application (RFA) process. The RFA process shall consist in part of an assessment of the past performance history of the DVSSP in relation to the standards established pursuant to paragraph (1). The RFA process shall comply with all applicable state and federal statutes for domestic violence center funding and, to the extent possible, the response to the RFA shall not exceed 10 narrative pages, excluding attachments.

(5) A DVSSP funded through this program in the previous grant cycle, including a DVSSP funded by Chapter 707 of the Statutes of 2001, shall be funded upon reapplication, unless, pursuant to the assessment required under the RFA process, its past performance history fails to meet the standards established by the Office of Emergency Services pursuant to paragraph (1).

(6) The Office of Emergency Services shall conduct a minimum of one site visit every three years for each DVSSP funded pursuant to this subdivision. The purpose of the site visit shall be to conduct a performance assessment of, and provide subsequent technical assistance for, each shelter visited. The performance assessment shall include, but need not be limited to, a review of all of the following:

(A) Progress in meeting program goals and objectives.

(B) Agency organization and facilities.

(C) Personnel policies, files, and training.

(D) Recordkeeping, budgeting, and expenditures.

(E) Documentation, data collection, and client confidentiality.

(7) After each site visit conducted pursuant to paragraph (6), the Office of Emergency Services shall provide a written report to the DVSSP summarizing the performance of the DVSSP, deficiencies noted, corrective action needed, and a deadline for corrective action to be completed. The Office of Emergency Services shall also develop a corrective action plan for verifying the completion of corrective action required. The Office of Emergency Services shall submit its written report to the DVSSP no more
 than 60 days after the site visit. No grant under the RFA process shall be denied if the DVSSP has not received a site visit during the previous three years, unless the Office of Emergency Services is aware of criminal violations relative to the administration of grant funding.

(8) If an agency receives funding from both the Comprehensive Statewide Domestic Violence Program in the Office of Emergency Services and the Maternal, Child, and Adolescent Health Division of the State Department of Public Health during any grant cycle, the Comprehensive Statewide Domestic Violence Program and the Maternal, Child, and Adolescent Health Division shall, to the extent feasible, coordinate agency site visits and share performance assessment data with the goal of improving efficiency, eliminating duplication, and reducing administrative costs.

(9) DVSSPs receiving written reports of
 deficiencies or orders for corrective action after a site visit shall be given no less than six months’ time to take corrective action before the deficiencies or failure to correct may be considered in the next RFA process. However, the Office of Emergency Services shall have the discretion to reduce the time to take corrective action in cases where the deficiencies present a significant health or safety risk or when other severe circumstances are found to exist. If corrective action is deemed necessary, and a DVSSP fails to comply, or if other deficiencies exist that, in the judgment of the Office of Emergency Services, cannot be corrected, the Office of Emergency Services shall determine, using its grading system, whether continued funding for the DVSSP should be reduced or denied altogether. If a DVSSP has been determined to be deficient, the Office of Emergency Services may, at any point during the DVSSP’s funding cycle following the expiration of the period for corrective action, deny or reduce further
 funding.

(10) If a DVSSP applies or reapplies for funding pursuant to this section and that funding is denied or reduced, the decision to deny or reduce funding shall be provided in writing to the DVSSP, along with a written explanation of the reasons for the reduction or denial made in accordance with the grading system for the RFP or RFA process. Except as otherwise provided, an appeal of the decision to deny or reduce funding shall be made in accordance with the appeal process established by the Office of Emergency Services. The appeal process shall allow a DVSSP a minimum of 30 days to appeal after a decision to deny or reduce funding. All pending appeals shall be resolved before final funding decisions are reached.

(11) It is the intent of the Legislature that priority for additional funds that become available shall be given to currently funded, new, or previously unfunded
 DVSSPs for expansion of services. However, the Office of Emergency Services may determine when expansion is needed to accommodate underserved or unserved areas. If supplemental funding is unavailable, the Office of Emergency Services shall have the authority to lower the base level of grants to all currently funded DVSSPs in order to provide funding for currently funded, new, or previously unfunded DVSSPs that will provide services in underserved or unserved areas. However, to the extent reasonable, funding reductions shall be reduced proportionately among all currently funded DVSSPs. After the amount of funding reductions has been determined, DVSSPs that are currently funded and those applying for funding shall be notified of changes in the available level of funding prior to the next application process. Funding reductions made under this paragraph shall not be subject to appeal.

(12) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
 the Office of Emergency Services may reduce funding to a DVSSP funded pursuant to this section if federal funding support is reduced. Funding reductions as a result of a reduction in federal funding shall not be subject to appeal.

(13) This section does not supersede any function or duty required by federal acts, rules, regulations, or guidelines for the distribution of federal grants.

(14) As a condition of receiving funding pursuant to this section, DVSSPs shall ensure that appropriate staff and volunteers having client contact meet the definition of “domestic violence counselor” as specified in
 subdivision (a) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code. The minimum training specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code shall be provided to those staff and volunteers who do not meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(15) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Domestic violence” means the infliction or threat of physical harm against past or present adult or adolescent intimate partners, including physical, sexual, and psychological abuse against the partner, and is a part of a pattern of assaultive, coercive, and controlling behaviors directed at achieving compliance from or control over that person.

(B) “Domestic violence shelter service provider” or “DVSSP” means a victim
 services provider that operates an established system of services providing safe and confidential emergency housing on a 24-hour basis for victims of domestic violence and their children, including, but not limited to, hotel or motel arrangements, haven, and safe houses.

(C) “Emergency shelter” means a confidential or safe location that provides emergency housing on a 24-hour basis for victims of domestic violence and their children.

(g) The Office of Emergency Services may hire the support staff and utilize all resources necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. The Office of Emergency Services shall not utilize more than 10 percent of funds appropriated for the purpose of the program established by this section for the administration of that program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 673)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.16.

(a) The Comprehensive Statewide Domestic Violence Program established pursuant to Section 13823.15 shall be collaboratively administered by the Office of Emergency Services and an advisory council. The membership of the Office of Emergency Services Domestic Violence Advisory Council shall consist of experts in the provision of either direct or intervention services to victims of domestic violence and their children, within the scope and intention of the Comprehensive Statewide Domestic Violence Assistance Program.

(b) The membership of the council shall consist of domestic violence victims’ advocates, battered women service providers, at least one representative of service providers serving the lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender community in connection with
 domestic violence, and representatives of women’s organizations, law enforcement, and other groups involved with domestic violence. At least one-half of the council membership shall consist of domestic violence victims’ advocates or battered women service providers. It is the intent of the Legislature that the council membership reflect the ethnic, racial, cultural, and geographic diversity of the state, including people with disabilities. The council shall be composed of no more than 13 voting members and two nonvoting ex officio members who shall be appointed, as follows:

(1) Seven voting members shall be appointed by the Governor, including at least one person recommended by the federally recognized state domestic violence coalition.

(2) Three voting members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(3) Three voting members shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(4) Two nonvoting ex officio members shall be Members of the Legislature, one appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and one appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. Any Member of the Legislature appointed to the council shall meet with the council and participate in its activities to the extent that participation is not incompatible with their position as a Member of the Legislature.

(c) The Office of Emergency Services shall collaborate closely with the council in developing funding priorities, framing the request for proposals, and soliciting proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 34.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.17.

(a) The Legislature finds the problem of domestic violence in the gay, lesbian, bisexual, and transgender community to be of serious and increasing magnitude. The Legislature also finds that existing domestic violence services for this population are underfunded and that members of this population are unserved or underserved in the state. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that a goal of the Office of Emergency Services shall be to increase access to domestic violence education, prevention, and services specifically for the gay, lesbian, bisexual, and transgender community.

(b) The goal of this section is to establish a targeted or directed grant program for the
 development and support of domestic violence programs and services for the gay, lesbian, bisexual, and transgender community. The Office of Emergency Services shall use funds from the Equality in Prevention and Services for Domestic Abuse Fund to award grants annually to qualifying organizations, with at least one in southern California and one in northern California, to fund domestic violence programs and services that are specific to the lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender community, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Counseling.

(2) Legal assistance with temporary restraining orders, devices, and custody disputes.

(3) Court and social service advocacy.

(4) Batterers intervention.

(5) Educational workshops and publications.

(6) Community resource and referral.

(7) Emergency housing.

(8) Hotline or warmline.

(9) Household establishment assistance.

(c) Each grant shall be awarded for a three-year term, as funds are available, for the purposes of this section.

(d) In order to be eligible to receive funds under this section, qualified organizations shall provide matching funds
 of at least 10 percent of the funds to be received under the section unless this requirement is waived by the Director of Emergency Services, at his or her discretion.

(e) As a condition of receiving funding pursuant to this section, grant recipients shall ensure that appropriate staff and volunteers having client contact meet the definition of “domestic violence counselor,” as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code. The minimum training specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code shall be provided to those staff and volunteers who do not meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(f) In order to qualify for a grant award under this section, the recipient
 shall be a California nonprofit organization with a demonstrated history of working in the area of domestic violence intervention, education, and prevention and serving the lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender community.

(g) The funding process for distributing grant awards to qualifying organizations shall be administered by the Office of Emergency Services as follows:

(1) Grant funds shall be awarded to qualifying organizations as a result of a competitive request for proposal (RFP) process. The RFP process shall comply with all applicable state and federal statutes and to the extent possible, the response to the RFP shall not exceed 15 narrative pages, excluding attachments.

(2) The following criteria shall be
 used to evaluate grant proposals:

(A) Whether the proposed program or services would further the purpose of promoting healthy, nonviolent relationships in the lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender community.

(B) Whether the proposed program or services would reach a significant number of people in, and have the support of, the lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender community.

(C) Whether the proposed program or services are grounded in a firm understanding of lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender domestic violence and represent an innovative approach to addressing the issue.

(D) Whether the proposed program or services would reach unique and
 underserved sectors of the lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender community, such as youth, people of color, immigrants, and transgender persons.

(3) Grant funds shall not be used to support any of the following:

(A) Scholarships.

(B) Awards to individuals.

(C) Out-of-state travel.

(D) Projects that are substantially completed before the anticipated date of the grant award.

(E) Fundraising activities.

(h) Grant recipients may seek, receive, and make use of any funds that may
 be available from all public and private sources to augment any funds received pursuant to this section.

(i) The Office of Emergency Services may adopt rules as necessary to implement the grant program created under this section.

(j) The Office of Emergency Services may hire the support staff and utilize all resources necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(k) The Office of Emergency Services shall consult with the State Department of Public Health to consider the consolidation of their respective domestic violence programs and report conclusions to the Legislature no later than June 30, 2011.

(l) For purposes of this section, “domestic
 violence” means the infliction or threat of physical harm against past or present adult or adolescent intimate partners, including physical, sexual, and psychological abuse against the person, and is a part of a pattern of assaultive, coercive, and controlling behavior directed at achieving compliance from or control over that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 440.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13824.
